Utah statutes.
73-10-32.   Definitions -- Water conservation plan required.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Board" means the Board of Water Resources created under Section 73-10-1.5.

(b)  "Division" means the Division of Water Resources created under Section 73-10-18.

(c)  "Retail" means the level of distribution of culinary water that supplies culinary water directly to the end user.

(d)  "Retail water provider" means an entity which:

(i)  supplies culinary water to end users; and

(ii)  has more than 500 service connections.

(e)  "Water conservancy district" means an entity formed under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 10, Water Conservancy District Act.

(f)  "Water conservation plan" means a written document that contains existing and proposed water conservation measures describing what will be done by retail water providers, water conservancy districts, and the end user of culinary water to help conserve water and limit or reduce its use in the state in terms of per capita consumption so that adequate supplies of water are available for future needs.

(2) (a)  Each water conservation plan shall contain:

(i)  a clearly stated overall water use reduction goal and an implementation plan for each of the water conservation measures it chooses to use, including a timeline for action and an evaluation process to measure progress;

(ii)  a requirement that each water conservancy district and retail water provider devote part of at least one regular meeting every five years of its governing body to a discussion and formal adoption of the water conservation plan, and allow public comment on it;

(iii)  a requirement that a notification procedure be implemented that includes the delivery of the water conservation plan to the media and to the governing body of each municipality and county served by the water conservancy district or retail water provider; and

(iv)  a copy of the minutes of the meeting and the notification procedure required in Subsections (2)(a)(ii) and (iii) which shall be added as an appendix to the plan.

(b)  A water conservation plan may include information regarding:

(i)  the installation and use of water efficient fixtures and appliances, including toilets, shower fixtures, and faucets;

(ii)  residential and commercial landscapes and irrigation that require less water to maintain;

(iii)  more water efficient industrial and commercial processes involving the use of water;

(iv)  water reuse systems, both potable and not potable;

(v)  distribution system leak repair;

(vi)  dissemination of public information regarding more efficient use of water, including public education programs, customer water use audits, and water saving demonstrations;

(vii)  water rate structures designed to encourage more efficient use of water;

(viii)  statutes, ordinances, codes, or regulations designed to encourage more efficient use of water by means such as water efficient fixtures and landscapes;

(ix)  incentives to implement water efficient techniques, including rebates to water users to encourage the implementation of more water efficient measures; and

(x)  other measures designed to conserve water.

(c)  The Division of Water Resources may be contacted for information and technical resources regarding measures listed in Subsections (2)(b)(i) through (2)(b)(x).

(3) (a)  Before April 1, 1999, each water conservancy district and each retail water provider shall:

(i) (A)  prepare and adopt a water conservation plan if one has not already been adopted; or

(B)  if the district or provider has already adopted a water conservation plan, review the existing water conservation plan to determine if it should be amended and, if so, amend the water conservation plan; and

(ii)  file a copy of the water conservation plan or amended water conservation plan with the division.

(b)  Before adopting or amending a water conservation plan, each water conservancy district or retail water provider shall hold a public hearing with reasonable, advance public notice.

(4) (a)  The board shall:

(i)  provide guidelines and technical resources to retail water providers and water conservancy districts to prepare and implement water conservation plans;

(ii)  investigate alternative measures designed to conserve water; and

(iii)  report regarding its compliance with the act and impressions of the overall quality of the plans submitted to the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee of the Legislature at its meeting in November 2004.

(b)  The board shall publish an annual report in a paper of state-wide distribution specifying the retail water providers and water conservancy districts that do not have a current water conservation plan on file with the board at the end of the calendar year.

(5)  A water conservancy district or retail water provider may only receive state funds for water development if they comply with the requirements of this act.

(6)  Each water conservancy district and retail water provider specified under Subsection (3)(a) shall:

(a)  update its water conservation plan no less frequently than every five years; and

(b)  follow the procedures required under Subsection (3) when updating the water conservation plan.

(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the water conservation plans, amendments to existing water conservation plans, and the studies and report by the board be handled within the existing budgets of the respective entities or agencies.

